Hawaii statutes.
[§371-18] Staffing for federally funded
programs. Positions established by the department to implement federally
funded employment or training programs, or both, including but not limited to
those established under the Comprehensive Employment and Training Act, Job
Training Partnership Act, Workforce Investment Act, and the welfare to work
program, may be exempt from chapter 76. [L 2003, c 103, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next